Washington statutes.
RCW 7.64.115

Execution of final judgment.

To the extent the final judgment entered at a show cause hearing or at any other time is not satisfied by proceedings under an order awarding possession issued at the show cause hearing, the judgment shall be executed in the same manner as any other judgment.

[ 1990 c 227 s 9.]